Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.120

Contributions by political committees to political committees. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

A political committee may make a contribution to another political committee only when the contributing political committee has received contributions of ten dollars or more each from at least 10 persons registered to vote in Washington state.

[ 2024 c 164 s 454; 2011 c 145 s 5. Formerly RCW 42.17A.442.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2011 c 145: See notes following RCW 29B.25.020.